New Mexico, session 2026, SB271.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF NEW MEXICO:
SECTION 1. [NEW MATERIAL] PRIVATE EQUITY GROUP AND HEDGE
FUND OWNERSHIP IN HEALTH CARE.--
A. As used in this section:
(1) "authority" means the health care
authority;
(2) "control" means the power to direct or
cause the direction of the management and policies of a health
care facility, whether directly or indirectly, including
through the ownership of voting securities, through licensing
.233998.2

wen
=
lairetam
derocsrednu
eteled
=
]lairetam
detekcarb[
S__/SB 271
or franchise agreements or by contract other than a commercial
contract for goods or nonmanagement services, unless the power
is the result of an official position with or corporate office
held by an individual;
(3) "health care facility" means a facility
licensed by the authority to provide health care services in a
health care setting. "Health care facility" does not include:
(a) a hospital that is owned or operated
by a local, state or federal government; or
(b) a health care organization owned or
controlled by one or more health care providers who are natural
persons that provide health care services in New Mexico;
(4) "health care provider" means a person
certified, registered, licensed or otherwise authorized under
state law to perform or provide health care services;
(5) "health care services" means the care,
prevention, diagnosis, treatment or relief of an illness, an
injury, a disease or other medical, dental, mental or
behavioral health or substance use disorder condition,
including:
(a) inpatient, outpatient, habilitative,
rehabilitative, dental, palliative, home health, hospice or
mental or behavioral health services provided by a health care

entity; or

(b) the provision of prescription drugs

.233998.2
- 2 -

wen
=
lairetam
derocsrednu
eteled
=
]lairetam
detekcarb[
S__/SB 271
through retail and specialty pharmacies;
(6) "hedge fund" means a pool of funds by
investors, including a pool of funds managed or controlled by
private limited partnerships, if those investors or the
management of that pool or private limited partnership employ
investment strategies of any kind to earn a return on that pool
of funds. "Hedge fund" does not include:
(a) a hospital that is owned or operated
by a local, state or federal government; or
(b) a health care organization owned or
controlled by one or more health care providers who are natural
persons that provide health care services in New Mexico;
(7) "own" or "ownership" means:
(a) direct or indirect possession of
equity in the capital, stock or profits totaling more than five
percent of an entity;
(b) a controlling interest held by a
private equity group; or
(c) a controlling interest held by a
hedge fund;
(8) "person" means an individual, an

association, an organization, a partnership, a firm, a 22
syndicate, a trust, a corporation or another legal entity; and

(9) "private equity group" means an investor

or a group of investors who primarily engage in the raising or

.233998.2
- 3 -

wen
=
lairetam
derocsrednu
eteled
=
]lairetam
detekcarb[
S__/SB 271
returning of capital and that invests, develops or disposes of
specified assets. "Private equity group" does not include:
(a) a hospital that is owned or operated
by a local, state or federal government; or
(b) a health care organization owned or
controlled by one or more health care providers who are natural
persons that provide health care services in New Mexico.
B. A private equity group or hedge fund involved in
any manner with a health care facility or health care provider
in this state shall not:
(1) interfere with the professional judgment
of a health care provider in making health care decisions,
including:
(a) determining what diagnostic tests
are appropriate for a particular condition;
(b) determining the need for referrals
to, or consultation with, another health care provider or
health care facility;
(c) being responsible for the ultimate
overall care of a patient, including determining treatment
options available to the patient; or
(d) determining how many patients a
health care provider shall see in a given period of time or how

many hours a health care provider is required to work; or

(2) exercise control over, or be delegated the

.233998.2
- 4 -

wen
=
lairetam
derocsrednu
eteled
=
]lairetam
detekcarb[
S__/SB 271
power to:
(a) own or otherwise determine the
content of patient medical records;
(b) select, hire or fire health care
providers or allied health professionals based, in whole or in
part, on clinical competency or proficiency;
(c) set the parameters under which a
health care provider is required to enter into contractual
relationships with third-party payers;
(d) set the parameters under which a
health care provider is required to enter into a contractual
relationship with other health care providers for the delivery
of care;
(e) make decisions regarding coding and
billing procedures for patient care services; or
(f) approve the selection of medical
equipment and medical supplies used by health care providers to
provide services to patients.
C. A private equity group or hedge fund, or an
entity owned or controlled by a private equity group or hedge
fund, shall not enter into a contract or other agreement with a

health care provider or health care facility doing business in 22
this state if the agreement or arrangement would enable the

private equity group or hedge fund to interfere with the

professional judgment of a health care provider or exercise

.233998.2
- 5 -

wen
=
lairetam
derocsrednu
eteled
=
]lairetam
detekcarb[
S__/SB 271
control over a health care provider in a manner that violates
this section.
D. A contract involving the management of a health
care facility doing business in this state or the sale of real
estate or other assets owned by a health care facility doing
business in this state to a private equity group or hedge fund,
or an entity owned or controlled by a private equity group or
hedge fund, shall not include any clause that bars a health
care provider from:
(1) practicing health care in competition with
the health care facility in the event of the health care
provider's termination or resignation; or
(2) disparaging, opining or commenting on the
health care facility in relation to the facility's quality of
care, utilization of care, ethical or professional challenges
or revenue-increasing strategies employed by the private equity
group or hedge fund.
E. Any provision of a contract or an agreement that
violates this section is void, unenforceable and against public
policy.
F. Nothing in this section shall affect the
validity of an otherwise valid provision of a contract or an
agreement that prohibits the disclosure of material nonpublic

information about the private equity group or hedge fund that

is not generally available to the public.

.233998.2
- 6 -

wen
=
lairetam
derocsrednu
eteled
=
]lairetam
detekcarb[
S__/SB 271
G. This section shall not be construed to prohibit
a person who is not licensed as a health care provider from
assisting or consulting with a health care facility doing
business in this state with respect to the decisions and
activities described in Paragraph (2) of Subsection B of this
section; provided that the health care facility retains the
ultimate responsibility for the approval and execution of those
decisions and activities.
- 7 -
















.233998.2